Utah statutes.
13-49-305.   Documents -- Consent to release -- Treatment of original documents.

(1)  An immigration consultant shall deliver to a client a copy of a document completed on behalf of the client.  An immigration consultant shall include on a document delivered to a client the name and address of the immigration consultant.

(2) (a)  An immigration consultant shall retain a copy of a document of a client for not less than three years from the date of the last service to the client.

(b)  Upon presentation of a written consent signed by a client, an immigration consultant shall provide a copy of the client file to law enforcement without a warrant or a subpoena.

(3) (a)  An immigration consultant shall return to a client all original documents that the client has provided to the immigration consultant in support of the client's application including an original birth certificate, rental agreement, utility bill, employment document, a registration document issued by the Division of Motor Vehicles, or a passport.

(b)  An original document that does not need to be submitted to immigration authorities as an original document shall be returned by the immigration consultant immediately after making a copy.



Enacted by Chapter 375, 2012 General Session

